Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 5 Search Warrants

12-5-1.
Authority to issue.

A search warrant may be issued by any judge of the district court. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be so construed as to restrain the power of the justices of the supreme or superior courts by virtue of §

8-3-6

to issue a search warrant.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be so construed as to restrain the power of the justices of the family court by virtue of §§

8-10-3

,

8-10-4

,

8-10-38

, and

11-9-9

to issue a search warrant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 16; P.L. 2002, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 262, § 1.

12-5-2.
Grounds for issuance.

A warrant may be issued under this chapter to search for and seize any of the following:

Property stolen or embezzled, or obtained by any false pretense, or pretenses, with intent to cheat or defraud within this state, or elsewhere;

Property kept, suffered to be kept, concealed, deposited, or possessed in violation of law, or for the purpose of violating the law;

Property designed or intended for use, or that is or has been used, in violation of law, or as a means of committing a violation of law;

Property that is evidence of the commission of a crime;

Samples of blood, saliva, hair, bodily tissues, bodily fluids, or dental impressions from the body of a person that may yield evidence of the identity of the perpetrator of a crime when subjected to scientific or other forensic analysis. The foregoing samples, and the results of any scientific or other forensic analysis, shall be admissible in all criminal proceedings, subject to application of the rules of evidence and criminal procedure. When any of the foregoing samples are seized for scientific or forensic analysis, the seizure shall be conducted in accordance with the regulations, guidelines, or protocols of the department of health or the state crime laboratory, as may be appropriate under the circumstances;

Samples of blood or breath that may yield evidence of the presence of alcohol or a controlled substance when subjected to a chemical test, as contemplated in §

31-27-2

. When any of the foregoing samples are seized for purposes of performing the aforementioned chemical test, the seizure shall be conducted in accordance with the regulations of the department of health that apply to the consensual collection of such a sample for purposes of the chemical test contemplated by §

31-27-2

; or

Property of a respondent under chapter 8.3 of title 8 where firearms may be under the possession, custody, or control of the respondent.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 178; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 31; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

12-5-1

; G.L., §

12-5-2

, as enacted by P.L. 1965, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 13; P.L. 2004, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 493, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 6, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 7, § 2.

12-5-3.
Issuance and contents.

A warrant shall issue only upon complaint in writing, under oath of:

A chief of police, deputy chief of police or other members of the police force of any city or town, or deputy sheriff of any county, member of the division of state police, full time conservation officer of the department of environmental management, or other person specifically authorized by law to bring complaints for violation of the law which it is his or her responsibility to enforce;

Additionally, in the case of property stolen, embezzled, or obtained by fraud or false pretenses, any person who has a right to the possession of the property.

Additionally, a sworn law enforcement member of any city or town where that member is serving on a statewide task force.

Within fourteen (14) days of the issuance of any warrant under this chapter, whether or not executed, the warrant, accompanied by any supporting affidavits and an inventory of any property seized, shall be returned to the district court having jurisdiction over the place of the search or, in the event of a warrant that is not executed, the court from which it was issued. The returns shall be maintained by the district court according to the date of issuance. If not otherwise indicated, the return shall note whether the warrant was executed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 178; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 31; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

12-5-1

; G.L., §

12-5-3

, as enacted by P.L. 1965, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 16; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 13; P.L. 1986, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 364, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 159, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 42.

12-5-3.1 — 12-5-3.13.
Repealed.

12-5-3.14.
Complaint for issuance of search warrant — Medicaid Fraud Control Unit.

In addition to those persons specified in §

12-5-3(a)(1)

, the director of investigations of the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit of the department of attorney general is authorized to sign written complaints, under oath, for the issuance of search warrants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 209, § 1.

12-5-3.15, 12-5-3.16.
Repealed.

12-5-3.17.
Complaint for issuance of search warrant — Town of North Kingstown.

In addition to those persons specified in §

12-5-3(a)

, detectives, and any rank above, in the town of North Kingstown police department are hereby authorized to sign written complaints, under oath, for the issuance of search warrants.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 299, § 1.

12-5-4.
Complainant officer exempt from surety for costs.

No officer or other person described in §

12-5-3(a)(1)

complaining as required by that section shall be required at the time of making a complaint to give surety for costs, or in any way to become liable for the costs that may accrue on it or for any damage on account of the seizure.

Any person described in §

12-5-3(a)(2)

complaining as required by that section shall give recognizance in the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 178; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 31; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

12-5-1

; G.L., §

12-5-4

; P.L. 1965, ch. 168, § 1.

12-5-5, 12-5-6.
Repealed.

12-5-7.
Disposition of seized property.

The property seized shall be safely kept by the officer seizing it, under the direction of the court, so long as may be necessary for the purpose of being used as evidence in any case.

As soon as may be thereafter, if the property is subject to forfeiture, further proceedings shall be had on the property for forfeiture as is prescribed by law in chapter 21 of this title.

If the property seized was stolen or otherwise unlawfully taken from the owner, or is not found to have been unlawfully used or intended for unlawful use, or is found to have been unlawfully used without the knowledge of the owner, it shall be returned to the person legally entitled to its possession.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 179; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

12-5-2

; G.L., §

12-5-7

; P.L. 1965, ch. 168, § 1.

12-5-8.
Hearing upon seizure of matter alleged to be obscene.

Whenever any deputy sheriff, municipal or state police officer, or any other person authorized by law to execute a search warrant shall seize any property alleged to be obscene, pursuant to a search warrant issued under the provisions of this chapter, the person in whose possession it is found or who claims a proprietary interest in it shall be entitled to a hearing before the superior court on the question of whether or not the property is obscene within three (3) days of the time a written demand is submitted to a judge of the superior court and notice served upon the attorney general, or in the case of towns and cities the chief legal officer of the town or city, and if a hearing is held, the court shall render a decision on the question within forty-eight (48) hours of the conclusion of the hearing. If by the decision the court determines that the matter is not obscene, it shall be immediately returned to the person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 42.

12-5-9.
Repealed.

12-5-10.
Electronic communication services.

Based on probable cause, a warrant may be issued to corporations located outside the state of Rhode Island that provide electronic communication services to the general public in connection with any communications sent to or received by customers or recipients located in Rhode Island. The warrant may require the provision of customer identity, data stored by or on behalf of the customer, the customer’s usage of those services, the recipient or destination of communications sent to or from those customers, or the content of those communications.

Any warrant issued under this section shall be honored within the state of Rhode Island and also in any foreign jurisdiction which has any law in place providing for the honoring of such warrants.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 198, § 1.